Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 3
NOTICE TO CREDITORS BY DISSOLVED ENTITIES -
ENFORCEMENT OF CLAIMS AGAINST DISSOLVED ENTITIES

7-90-911. Disposition of known claims by notification - definitions.

A dissolved domestic entity may dispose of claims against it by following the procedures described in this section.

A dissolved domestic entity may deliver notice under this subsection (2) to any person at any time on or after the effective date of the dissolution. The notice contemplated in this subsection (2) must state that, unless sooner barred by any other statute limiting actions, any claim of that person against the dissolved domestic entity will be barred if an action to enforce the claim is not commenced by a deadline that is stated in the notice, which deadline shall not be less than two years after the delivery of notice. The notice may contain such other information as the dissolved entity determines to include, including information regarding procedures facilitating the processing of claims against the dissolved entity; except that no obligations on persons having claims against the dissolved entity shall be imposed or implied that do not exist at law.

Unless sooner barred by any other statute limiting actions, a person's claim against the dissolved domestic entity is barred if the dissolved entity delivers a notice of dissolution as contemplated by subsection (2) of this section and an action to enforce the claim is not commenced by the deadline stated in the notice.

For purposes of this section, "claim" does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution. For purposes of this section, an action to enforce a claim includes an arbitration under any agreement for binding arbitration between the dissolved domestic entity and the person making the claim and includes a civil action.

For purposes of this section and sections 7-90-912 and 7-90-913, "dissolved domestic entity" means a dissolved domestic cooperative other than a domestic cooperative formed under article 55 of this title, a dissolved domestic corporation, a dissolved domestic limited liability company, or a dissolved domestic nonprofit corporation.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 876, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 162, § 5, effective April 19.

7-90-912. Disposition of claims by publication.

A dissolved domestic entity may publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the dissolved domestic entity present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice contemplated in subsection (1) of this section shall:

Be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state in which the street address of the dissolved domestic entity's principal office is or was last located or, if the dissolved domestic entity has not had a principal office in this state, in the county in which the street address of its registered agent is or was last located; and

State that, unless sooner barred by any other statute limiting actions, any claim against the dissolved entity will be barred if an action to enforce the claim is not commenced within five years after the publication of the notice or within four months after the claim arises, whichever is later. The notice may contain such other information as the dissolved entity determines to include, including information regarding procedures facilitating the processing of claims against the dissolved entity; except that no obligations on persons having claims against the dissolved entity shall be imposed or implied that do not exist at law.

If the dissolved domestic entity publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, then, unless sooner barred under section 7-90-911 or under any other statute limiting actions, the claim of any person against the dissolved domestic entity is barred unless the person commences an action to enforce the claim within five years after the publication date of the notice or within four months after the claim arises, whichever is later.

For purposes of this section and except where permitted to be disposed of under section 7-90-911, "claim" means any claim, excluding claims of this state, whether known, due or to become due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, founded on contract, tort, or other legal basis, or otherwise. For purposes of this section, an action to enforce a claim includes an arbitration under any agreement for binding arbitration between the dissolved domestic entity and the person making the claim and includes a civil action.

This section shall not apply to a claim with respect to which notice has been delivered by a dissolved domestic entity under section 7-90-911.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 876, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 245, § 41, effective May 29.

7-90-913. Enforcement of claims against a dissolved domestic entity.

A claim may be enforced under section 7-90-911 or 7-90-912:

Against the dissolved domestic entity to the extent of its undistributed assets; and

If assets have been distributed in liquidation, against an owner of the dissolved domestic entity; except that an owner's total liability for all claims under this section shall not exceed the total value of assets distributed to the owner, as such value is determined at the time of distribution. Any owner required to return any portion of the value of assets received by the owner in liquidation shall be entitled to contribution from all other owners. Each such contribution shall be in accordance with the contributing owner's rights and interests and shall not exceed the value of the assets received by the contributing owner in liquidation.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 876, § 64, effective July 1.

7-90-914. Court proceedings.

A dissolved domestic entity that has published a notice under section 7-90-912 may file an application with the court for the county in this state in which the street address of the domestic entity's principal office or the street address of its registered agent is located for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that:

Are contingent;

Have not been made known to the dissolved domestic entity; or

Arise from an event that had not occurred as of the effective date of dissolution but, based on the facts known to the dissolved domestic entity, is reasonably anticipated to occur after the effective date of dissolution.

Provision need not be made for any claim that is, or is reasonably anticipated to be, barred under section 7-90-912 (3).

Within ten days after the filing of the application, the dissolved domestic entity shall give notice of the proceeding to each claimant holding a contingent claim whose contingent claim is shown on the records of the dissolved domestic entity.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown in any proceeding brought under this section. The dissolved entity shall pay the reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian ad litem, including all reasonable expert witness fees.

Provision by the dissolved entity for security in the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection (1) of this section satisfies the dissolved entity's obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the dissolved entity, or arise from an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and the claims may not be enforced against an owner who received assets in liquidation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1922, § 24, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-915. Manager duties.

A manager shall cause the dissolved domestic entity to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions of assets to owners after payment or provision for claims.

A manager of a dissolved domestic entity that has disposed of claims under section 7-90-911, 7-90-912, or 7-90-914 is not liable for breach of subsection (1) of this section with respect to claims against the dissolved domestic entity that are barred or satisfied under section 7-90-911, 7-90-912, or 7-90-914.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1923, § 24, effective July 1, 2020.